Georgia, session 2025_26, HB37.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 2 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to elementary and
secondary education, is amended in Code Section 20-2-55, relating to per diem, insurance,
and expenses of local board members, by revising paragraph (1) of subsection (b) as follows:
"(b)(1) A local board of education is authorized to provide group medical and dental
insurance for its members who elect to participate. Such insurance may be provided
through a group policy secured by the local school district, a group policy secured by
several local school districts, a policy secured by an organization of local school boards,
- 1 -

LC 61 0251S
or in accordance with Code Section 45-18-5 providing for the inclusion of members of
the local board of education and their spouses and dependents within any health insurance
plan or plans established under Article 1 of Chapter 18 of Title 45. It shall be the duty
of the board to make the employer contributions required for the operation of such plan
or plans. Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, a board providing such
insurance shall pay no greater percentage of the cost of that insurance than the percentage
of the cost paid as an employer contribution by the state for the health insurance plan for
state employees pursuant to Article 1 of Chapter 18 of Title 45. The remainder of such
insurance costs, and all the costs of any coverage for family members, shall be paid as an
employee contribution by the board member. It shall be the duty of the board to deduct
from the salary or other remuneration of qualified members or otherwise collect such
payment from the qualified members or dependents."
SECTION 2.
Said chapter is further amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"20-2-219.1.
(a) Beginning July 1, 2025, and continuing thereafter, each local school system shall, upon
hiring a new employee, provide such new employee the following:
(1) Notice of whether:
(A) Social security taxes will be withheld from his or her pay;
(B) He or she is eligible to be included in a plan with coverage for the benefits of Title
II of the Social Security Act; and
(C) He or she is eligible to be included in any other pension or retirement plan; and
(2) If he or she is eligible to be included in one or more plans provided for in
subparagraph (B) or (C) of paragraph (1) of this subsection, information regarding such
plan or plans.
- 2 -

LC 61 0251S
(b) No later than December 31, 2025, and at least once every five years thereafter, each
local school system shall provide each current employee with the notice required in
paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this Code section.
(c) Beginning July 1, 2025, and continuing thereafter, each local school system shall notify
each employee at or near the time of such employee's separation whether social security
taxes were withheld from his or her pay during any part of his or her employment."
SECTION 3.
This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025.
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
- 3 -